Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 609.035 is amended to read:
609.035. As used in ORS 609.035 to 609.110 and 609.990:
(1) “Boarding kennel”:
(a) Means, except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a facility that provides care
for a fee to dogs that stay at the facility an average of less than 30 days.
(b) Does not mean a facility that is subject to ORS 167.374 or 167.376.
(2) “Dog control board” means a  group of persons whose duties include, but need not be limited
to, fulfilling the duties of a dog control district board of supervisors as described in ORS 609.030.
(3) “Dog control officer” means a person whose duties include,  but need not be limited to, en-
forcing the dog control laws for a dog control district.
(4) “Domestic animal” means an animal, other  than livestock or equines, that is owned
or possessed by a person.
[(4)] (5)  “Keeper” means a person who  owns, possesses, controls or otherwise has charge of a
dog, other than:
(a) A boarding kennel;
(b) A humane society or other nonprofit animal shelter;
(c) A facility impounding dogs on behalf of a city or county; or
(d) A veterinary facility.
(6) “Livestock” means ratites, horses,  hinnies, mules, donkeys, cattle, llamas, alpacas,
sheep, goats, swine, domesticated fowl and any fur-bearing animal bred  and maintained
commercially or otherwise, within pens, cages or hutches.
[(5)] (7)  “Menaces” means lunging, growling, snarling or other behavior by a dog that would
cause a reasonable person to fear for the person’s safety.
[(6)] (8) “Potentially dangerous dog” means a dog that:
(a) Without provocation and while not on premises  from which the keeper may lawfully exclude
others, menaces a person;
(b) Without provocation, inflicts physical injury on a person that  is less severe than a serious
physical injury; or
(c) Without provocation and while not on premises from  which the keeper may lawfully exclude
others, inflicts physical injury on or kills  livestock or  a domestic  animal [ as defined in ORS
167.310].
Enrolled Senate Bill 733 (SB 733-A) Page 1
[(7)] (9)  “Running at large” means that a dog is off or outside of  the premises from which the
keeper of the dog may lawfully exclude others,  or is not in the company of and under the control
of its keeper, except if the dog is:
(a) Being used to legally hunt, chase or tree wildlife while under the supervision of the  keeper;
(b) Being used to control or protect livestock or for other activities related to agriculture; or
(c) Within any part of a vehicle.
[(8)] (10) “Serious physical injury” has the meaning given that term in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 609.125 is amended to read:
609.125. As used in ORS 609.135 to 609.190,  “livestock” means ratites, psittacines, horses,
hinnies, mules, [ jackasses] donkeys, cattle, llamas, alpacas, sheep, goats,  swine, domesticated fowl
and any fur-bearing animal bred  and maintained commercially or otherwise, within pens, cages and
hutches.
Passed by Senate April 2, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 733 (SB 733-A) Page 2